Illinois, session 104th, SB1790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Extreme Weather Recovery Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; intent; purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (i) climate disasters, extreme weather attributable to 9    climate change, and harms resulting from long-term changes 10    to the climate system pose a threat to the health, safety, 11    and security of all residents of, and visitors to, 12    Illinois;13        (ii) climate change poses many costly risks to 14    Illinois residents, including an increase in precipitation 15    and severe storms, hotter temperatures, and intensified 16    drought;17        (iii) average annual precipitation in Illinois has 18    increased by 12% to 15%; and extreme precipitation events 19    (days with more than 2 inches of precipitation) have 20    increased by 40% since the beginning of the 20th century, 21    resulting in more frequent flooding;22        (iv) insurance companies lost money on policies 23    associated with property insurance in Illinois in 2023,   SB1790- 2 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    due mostly to damage from severe storms;2        (v) the average temperature in Illinois is predicted 3    to increase by up to 9°F by 2100 under a moderate climate 4    scenario (RCP4.5); the average daily temperature has 5    already increased by 1 to 2°F in most areas of the State; 6    and the average nighttime temperature has increased by 7    more than 3°F over the last 120 years;8        (vi) warmer temperatures will change the composition 9    of Illinois forests and decrease agricultural yields of 10    corn, soybeans, and other crops;11        (vii) heat stress caused by climate change is likely 12    to reduce corn yields by 23% to 34% in Illinois by the 13    middle of this century;14        (viii) all Illinoisans are at risk of concrete and 15    particularized injuries caused by the increasing 16    prevalence and intensity of climate disasters, extreme 17    weather attributable to climate change, and harms 18    resulting from long-term changes to the climate system;19        (ix) Illinois has a compelling State interest in 20    protecting its citizens from climate disasters, extreme 21    weather attributable to climate change, and harms 22    resulting from long-term changes to the climate system;23        (x) the cost and impact of climate disasters, extreme 24    weather attributable to climate change, and harms 25    resulting from long-term changes to the climate system 26    continue to increase, straining public resources in this   SB1790- 3 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    State; and2        (xi) impacts in Illinois causally connected to 3    responsible parties' qualified products and actions during 4    the covered period include, but are not limited to:5            (A) damage to public property and infrastructure, 6        as well as adjacent private property and 7        infrastructure;8            (B) natural resource damages to public and private 9        resources;10            (C) increased risk, hours, and compensation to 11        emergency responders faced with increasingly frequent 12        and severe events;13            (D) significant and costly health and safety 14        upgrades to public buildings before generally accepted 15        amortization and depreciation timelines, resulting in 16        additional taxpayer expenses now and into the future;17            (E) significant and costly occupational 18        productivity losses and costs from workplace health 19        and safety regulations that are increasingly necessary 20        and required to protect employers and employees from 21        increased risks and hazards related to climate change 22        and extreme weather attributable to climate change;23            (F) canceled school days because of climate 24        disasters and extreme weather attributable to climate 25        change, resulting in educational harms to students 26        that have long-lasting impacts on workforce, business,   SB1790- 4 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        and economic development; and2            (G) increasing public and private health costs 3        stemming from indoor and outdoor pollution, 4        contamination, and exposure to toxic materials, 5        whether in combination or occurring separately, 6        exacerbated by the impacts of climate disasters and 7        extreme weather attributable to climate change;8        (xii) a judicial forum is necessary for Illinoisans to 9    redress the harm that responsible parties have caused and 10    continue to cause through climate disasters, extreme 11    weather attributable to climate change, and harms 12    resulting from long-term changes to the climate system 13    fueled by their products and actions. Illinois has a 14    compelling State interest in empowering citizens to 15    recover, recoup, or rebuild the value of lost, damaged, 16    and destroyed property, as well as the full extent of 17    non-economic, compensatory, and punitive damages allowable 18    under this State's laws and constitution;19        (xiii) the courts of this State are the appropriate 20    venue to provide additional relief to harmed parties as 21    deemed necessary or proper in the course of legal 22    proceedings brought under the authority of this Act;23        (xiv) this State has a compelling interest in 24    preserving public resources for traditional public 25    purposes. It is not the desire of this State to continue 26    paying for increased damages to harmed parties caused by   SB1790- 5 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    the profit-seeking actions and omissions of responsible 2    parties' qualified products and actions;3        (xv) climate disasters, extreme weather attributable 4    to climate change, and harms resulting from long-term 5    changes to the climate system are not acts of God, 6    unforeseeable, or otherwise classified as a force majeure 7    event eligible for litigation limitations or defenses, 8    except as explicitly and unambiguously provided;9        (xvi) decades of intentional lies, misinformation, and 10    disinformation, and misrepresentations by responsible 11    parties about the connection between qualified products 12    and climate change has directly and causally contributed 13    to concrete and particularized injuries in this State from 14    climate disasters, extreme weather attributable to climate 15    change, and harms resulting from long-term changes to the 16    climate system. Continued lies, misinformation, and 17    disinformation, and misrepresentations pose a threat to 18    the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and 19    visitors to, this State. Responsible parties have 20    long-known the dangers of their qualified products but 21    continued to deny and lie for profit. Hiding, obfuscating, 22    and denying information to consumers, elected officials, 23    and regulators alike harmed and continues to harm 24    Illinoisans. This State has a compelling interest in 25    protecting consumers from lies, misinformation, and 26    disinformation in the marketplace, and encouraging factual   SB1790- 6 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    and truthful information on climate disasters, extreme 2    weather attributable to climate change, harms resulting 3    from long-term changes to the climate system, and the 4    qualified products and actions of responsible parties. The 5    General Assembly further finds and declares that:6            (A) responsible parties have engaged in a 7        decades-long project to protect their profits with a 8        coordinated effort to deceive the public about the 9        reality of the climate crisis;10            (B) documents unveiled by litigation and 11        investigative journalists demonstrate that as early as 12        the 1950s, responsible parties became aware of the 13        potentially catastrophic impact of their products. 14        Even in the face of research conducted by their own 15        scientists affirming the impacts of their business, 16        responsible parties outright denied that climate 17        change was real, spread disinformation to cast doubt 18        on the science, and fought regulatory action against 19        qualified products;20            (C) the 1970s and 1980s saw the development of a 21        clear scientific consensus that increasing CO2 22        concentration in the atmosphere would contribute to 23        global warming and that the heightened CO2 emissions 24        were attributable to fossil fuels. These facts were 25        supported by fossil-fuel industry scientists like 26        Exxon's James F. Black, who provided these findings in   SB1790- 7 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        a 1977 presentation and a 1978 briefing of Exxon 2        management. In 1979, W.L. Ferrall outlined that an 3        internal Exxon study concluded that the "present trend 4        of fossil-fuel consumption will cause dramatic 5        environmental effects before the year 2050." In 1982, 6        R.W. Cohen summarized that Exxon's climate modeling 7        research was "consistent with the published prediction 8        of more complex climate models" and "in accord with 9        the scientific consensus on the effect of increased 10        atmospheric CO2 on climate." A 1988 Shell report 11        echoed the Exxon warnings and acknowledged the need to 12        consider policy changes. The report provided that "the 13        potential implications for the world are... so large 14        that policy options need to be considered much 15        earlier" and that research should be "directed more to 16        the analysis of policy and energy options than to 17        studies of what we will be facing exactly";18            (D) despite acknowledging that increased CO2 19        concentrations because of fossil-fuel combustion posed 20        a considerable threat, responsible parties decided not 21        to take steps to prevent the risks of climate change. 22        Instead, they stopped funding major climate research, 23        and launched campaigns to discredit climate science 24        and delay actions perceived as contrary to their 25        business interests. These responsible parties carried 26        out these campaigns by:  SB1790- 8 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1                (1) developing public relations strategies 2            that were contradictory to their knowledge and 3            scientific insights;4                (2) engaging in public communications 5            campaigns to promote doubt and downplay the 6            threats of climate change; and7                (3) funding individuals, organizations, and 8            research aimed at discrediting the growing body of 9            publicly available climate science.10            (E) from 1970 to 2020 the oil and gas industry 11        responsible parties made nearly $2.8 billion a day and 12        $1 trillion a year in profit;13            (F) responsible parties currently advertise 14        "green" efforts to the public that mask the lack of 15        real investment in resiliency and energy-source 16        transition and the continued prioritization of the 17        extraction, refinement, and distribution of qualified 18        products;19            (G) a December 2022 report by the Oversight 20        Committee in Congress also revealed internal documents 21        from senior leaders in responsible parties that 22        explicitly reject taking accountability for the 23        greenhouse gas emissions associated with their 24        products;25            (H) by their conduct and impact, responsible 26        parties have intentionally obfuscated the truth about   SB1790- 9 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        climate change and outright deceived the public to 2        continue dependence on their qualified products;3        (xvii) intentional lies, misinformation, and 4    disinformation, and misrepresentations by responsible 5    parties about the connection between qualified products 6    they sell or sold and climate change is not political 7    speech, but fundamentally commercial activity with 8    incidental political impact; and9        (xviii) that responsible parties must be accountable 10    to harmed parties. The General Assembly hereby explicitly 11    authorizes a cause of action to harmed parties, including 12    individuals, businesses, and associations. This State has 13    a sovereign and compelling State interest in providing a 14    forum for individuals, businesses, and associations 15    sustaining injuries and harms caused by responsible 16    parties' deceptive behavior and linked to the harms of 17    responsible parties' products and actions. It is the 18    intent of this State to provide a judicial forum for the 19    efficient, just, and equitable resolution of harmed 20    parties' claims for damages stemming from climate 21    disasters, extreme weather attributable to climate change, 22    and harms resulting from long-term changes to the climate 23    system, as defined herein, against responsible parties.24    (b) It is the purpose of this Act to create a new cause of 25action independent of existing law. Nothing in this Act may be 26construed to limit in any way the enforceability of existing   SB1790- 10 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1laws concerning consumer protection, climate, environment, 2energy, or natural resources. 3    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    (a) "Amount in controversy" means the damages claimed or 5relief demanded by the injured party or parties in a lawsuit.6    (b) "Extreme event attribution science" means research 7aimed at understanding how human-induced changes in the global 8climate system affect the probability, severity, and other 9characteristics of extreme weather events such as hurricanes 10and heat waves. This may include, but not be limited to, 11determining the likelihood of the particular event happening 12today compared to how it might have unfolded without 13human-caused increase in concentration of greenhouse gases in 14the atmosphere.15    (c) "Climate disaster" means an event that meets any of 16the following threshold qualifications and is determined by 17impact attribution science or extreme event attribution 18science to be substantially worsened (at least statistically 19significant) or caused by climate change from responsible 20parties' products or extreme weather attributable to climate 21change from responsible parties' products:22        (i) a "major disaster" as defined by the Federal 23    Emergency Management Agency in July of 2024, without 24    recognition of any changes to that definition that may 25    occur at a later time by subsequent agency administration,   SB1790- 11 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    or removal of the definition from the public domain or 2    Code of Federal Regulations;3        (ii) "any natural catastrophe" (including any 4    hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, 5    tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, 6    landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, or drought), or, 7    regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion, in any 8    part of the United States, which in the determination of 9    the President causes damage of sufficient severity and 10    magnitude to warrant major disaster assistance under this 11    Act to supplement the efforts and available resources of 12    states, local governments, and disaster relief 13    organizations in alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, 14    or suffering caused thereby. This includes, but is not 15    limited to, the definition of a natural catastrophe in the 16    Stafford Act such as any hurricane, tornado, storm, high 17    water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, 18    volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, or 19    drought or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood or 20    explosion, in any part of the United States, which in the 21    determination of the President causes damage of sufficient 22    severity and magnitude to warrant major disaster 23    assistance under this the Stafford Act to supplement the 24    efforts and available resources of local and state 25    governments and disaster relief organizations in 26    alleviating the damage, loss, hardship or suffering caused   SB1790- 12 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    thereby;2        (iii) a "catastrophic incident" as defined by the 3    Federal Emergency Management Agency in July of 2024 (not 4    including events linked to terrorism), without recognition 5    of any changes to that definition that may occur at a later 6    time by a later agency administration or removal of the 7    definition from the public domain or Code of Federal 8    Regulations;9        (iv) any natural or man-made incident that results in 10    extraordinary levels of mass casualties, damage, or 11    disruption severely affecting the population, 12    infrastructure, environment, economy, national morale, or 13    government functions. A catastrophic event could result in 14    sustained national impacts over a prolonged period of 15    time; almost immediately exceeds resources normally 16    available to local, state, tribal, and private sector 17    authorities in the impacted area; and significantly 18    interrupts governmental operations and emergency services 19    to such an extent that national security could be 20    threatened;21        (v) any event that does qualify, or would have 22    qualified, for inclusion on the National Centers for 23    Environmental Information's "Billion-Dollar Weather and 24    Climate Disasters" program and data list as it existed in 25    July of 2024, without recognition of any changes weakening 26    the agency program that may occur at a later time by   SB1790- 13 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    subsequent agency administration or abolition of the 2    program, National Centers for Environmental Information, 3    or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration; 4    and5        (vi) a gubernatorial proclamation that a disaster 6    exists under the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act.7    (d) "Covered period" means the period from January 1, 1965 8to the effective date of this Act.9    (e) "Extreme weather attributable to climate change" means 10weather, climate, or environmental conditions including, but 11not limited to, temperature, precipitation, drought, or 12flooding that are consistent with impacts or events that are 13attributable to climate change and where the intensity, 14magnitude, location, timing, or extent of the event lie 15outside the historical distribution of measurements for that 16type of event or impact for a particular place and time of 17year. These events include those that "extreme event 18attribution science" determines were made more likely or 19severe by climate change.20    (f) "Generally accepted amortization and depreciation 21timelines" means methods used and encouraged by the Internal 22Revenue Service and Generally Accepted Accounting Principles.23    (g) "Gross negligence" means negligence that is materially 24greater than the mere absence of reasonable care under the 25circumstances and that is characterized by indifference to or 26reckless disregard of the rights of others.  SB1790- 14 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    (h) "Harmed parties" means any person, business, or 2association harmed or suffering damages in the amount of at 3least $10,000 as a result of a climate disaster or extreme 4weather attributable to climate change.5    (i) "Impact attribution science" means research aimed at 6understanding how global climate change affects human and 7natural systems, including but not limited to localized 8physical impacts, such as floods, droughts, and sea level 9rise, and the corresponding effects on infrastructure, public 10health, ecosystems, agriculture, and economies.11    (j) "Long-term changes to the climate system" includes, 12but is not limited to: increases in average temperature; 13disruptions to ocean chemistry, circulation, and temperature; 14sea level rise; variation in precipitation; saltwater 15intrusion into drinking water; sunny day flooding; decreased 16snowpack and seasonal water availability; drought; and species 17mortality and extinction.18    (k) "Market-share liability" means liability that is 19imposed severally on each member of an industry, based on each 20member's share of the market or respective percentage of the 21qualified product placed on the market.22    (l) "Qualified product" means a fossil-fuel product 23including, but not limited to:24        (i) Crude petroleum oil and all other hydrocarbons, 25    regardless of gravity, that are produced at the wellhead 26    in liquid form by ordinary production methods;  SB1790- 15 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        (ii) Natural, manufactured, mixed, and byproduct 2    hydrocarbon gas; or3        (iii) Refined crude oil, crude tops, topped crude, 4    processed crude, processed crude petroleum, residue from 5    crude petroleum, cracking stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel 6    oil, treated crude oil, residuum, gas oil, casinghead 7    gasoline, natural-gas gasoline, kerosene, benzine, wash 8    oil, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil, and 9    blends or mixtures of oil with one or more liquid products 10    or byproducts derived from oil or gas.11    (m) "Responsible party" means a firm, corporation, 12company, partnership, society, joint stock company or any 13other entity or association that emitted or caused to be 14emitted through the extracting, storing, transporting, 15refining, importing, exporting, producing, manufacturing, 16distributing, compounding, marketing, or offering for 17wholesale or retail sale, a qualified product with total 18greenhouse gas emissions of at least one billion metric tons 19of carbon dioxide equivalent during the covered period. It 20does not include any public utility, public authority, or the 21State and its political subdivisions.22    (n) "Statute of limitation" means that an action under 23this Act must be commended within 3 years after the cause of 24action accrued.25    (o) "Strict liability" means liability that does not 26depend on actual negligence or intent to harm, but that is   SB1790- 16 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1based on the breach of an absolute duty to make something safe. 2    Section 15. Civil action enforcement. 3    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the requirements of 4this Act shall be enforced exclusively through the civil 5actions described in this Act.6    (b) Any person, other than an officer or employee of a 7State or local governmental entity in this State, may bring a 8civil action against any responsible party for climate 9disasters or extreme weather attributable to climate change or 10both as defined in this Act when the following conditions are 11met:12        (i) The person qualifies as a harmed party.13        (ii) During any part of the covered period, the 14    responsible party did business in Illinois, was registered 15    to do business in Illinois, was appointed an agent of the 16    State, or otherwise had sufficient contacts with the State 17    to give the State jurisdiction over the responsible party 18    under Illinois law.19        (iii) The statute of limitations for the action has 20    not expired.21        (iv) The amount in controversy is at least $10,000. 22    Plaintiff allegations of the amount in controversy at the 23    pleading stage must be given judicial deference. Multiple 24    plaintiffs (regardless of association in a class action) 25    must be allowed to aggregate claims without common injury   SB1790- 17 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    caused by climate disasters or extreme weather 2    attributable to climate change to reach the amount in 3    controversy threshold. The courts of this State are 4    encouraged to process these actions with simplified 5    procedural rules, streamlined enforcements, and other 6    remedied mechanisms.7    (c) No enforcement of this Act may be taken or threatened 8by the State, a political subdivision of the State, or an 9executive or administrative officer or employee of the State 10or a political subdivision, or a unit of local government or an 11attorney representing any one of these governmental entities.12    (d) Responsible parties are jointly and severally liable 13to the plaintiffs for strict liability if they are a harmed 14party.15    (e) Harmed parties may commence an action against 16responsible parties for recovery of damages in any one of the 17following counties:18        (i) the county in which all or a substantial part of 19    the events giving rise to the action occurred;20        (ii) the county of residence for any one of the 21    natural person defendants at the time the cause of action 22    accrued;23        (iii) the county of the principal office in this State 24    of any one of the defendants that is not a natural person; 25    or26        (iv) the county of residence for any plaintiff if the   SB1790- 18 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    plaintiff is a natural person residing in the State.2    Notwithstanding any other law, if a civil action is 3brought under this Act in one of the venues in this Section16, 4the action may not be transferred to a different venue, 5including federal court, without the written consent of all 6parties.7    (g) The fact that harmed parties bring legal action 8against responsible parties under this Act may not be an 9independent basis for enforcement of any other law of this 10State; or the denial, revocation, suspension, or withholding 11of any right or privilege conferred by the law of the State or 12a political subdivision of the State, or a threat to do the 13same.14    (h) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to do any of the 15following:16        (i) Limit the enforceability of any other laws that 17    regulate or prohibit any conduct relating to climate 18    disasters, extreme weather, greenhouse gas emissions, or 19    consumer protection.20        (ii) Replace legally mandated disaster recovery funds, 21    designated disaster recovery funds established by 22    legislation or administrative rule, contractually 23    obligated, or court-ordered insurance claim payouts.24    (i) If a claimant prevails in an action brought under this 25Section, the court shall award all of the following:26        (i) The full extent of non-economic, compensatory, and   SB1790- 19 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    punitive damages allowable under Illinois law and 2    Constitution.3        (ii) Compensatory damages in an amount of not less 4    than the fair market value of recovering, recouping, 5    rebuilding, or remediating the value of lost, damaged, and 6    destroyed property.7        (iii) Compensatory damages in an amount not less than 8    the cost of injuries to harmed parties including medical 9    care, mental and behavioral health care, past and present 10    pain and suffering, or emotional distress.11    (j) Notwithstanding any other law, a cause of action under 12this Section shall be extinguished unless the action is 13commenced no later than 3 years after the cause of action 14accrues.15    (k) The connection of a climate disaster, extreme weather 16attributable to climate change, or harms resulting from 17long-term changes to the climate system to alleged injuries 18shall be deemed an injury in fact for all residents of, and 19visitors to, Illinois. Any such person shall have standing to 20bring a civil action under this Act.21    (l) Notwithstanding any other law, none of the following 22is a defense to an action brought under this Act:23        (i) A defendant's ignorance or mistake of law.24        (ii) A defendant's belief that the requirements of 25    this Act are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional.26        (iii) A defendant's reliance on any court decision   SB1790- 20 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    that has been overruled on appeal or by a subsequent 2    court, even if that court decision had not been overruled 3    when the defendant engaged in conduct that violates this 4    Act.5        (iv) A defendant's reliance on any State or federal 6    court decision that is not binding on the court in which 7    the action has been brought.8        (v) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim 9    preclusion.10        (vi) Any claim that the enforcement of this Act or the 11    imposition of civil liability against the defendant will 12    violate a constitutional right of a third party.13        (vii) A defendant's assertion that this Act proscribes 14    conduct that is separately prohibited by any other law of 15    Illinois.16        (viii) Any claim that defendants' or responsible 17    parties' qualified products were not misused, or were not 18    intended to be misused, in an unlawful manner.19        (ix) A defendant's assertion that State or federal 20    laws relating to qualified products and responsible 21    parties' operations displace, abrogate, or supersede the 22    actions authorized under this Act, the authority of the 23    courts of Illinois to provide a forum for the action, or 24    the authority of the courts of Illinois to provide a 25    remedy to harmed parties.26        (x) A defendant's assertion that choice-of-law and   SB1790- 21 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    choice-of-forum clauses govern the action, regardless of 2    whether such clauses apply to harmed parties by basis of 3    consumer transactions.4        (xi) A defendant's assertion that the plaintiff or 5    plaintiffs assumed a risk of harm through the use of their 6    products.7        (xii) A defendant's forum non conveniens assertion so 8    long as the jurisdictional requirements of this Act are 9    satisfied.10    (m) An action brought under this Section may be resolved 11by settlement through mediation or arbitration upon written 12consent of both parties; however, mediation or arbitration may 13not be mandated by Illinois courts.14    (n) This Act shall not be construed to impose liability on 15any speech or conduct protected by the First Amendment to the 16United States Constitution, as made applicable to the states 17through the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States 18Constitution, or by the Illinois Constitution.19    (o) Notwithstanding any other law, the State, a State 20official or a unit of local government or an attorney 21representing any one of these governmental entities may not 22intervene in an action brought under this Section. However, 23this subsection does not prohibit a person described by this 24subsection from filing an amicus curiae brief in the action.25    (p) Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not award 26attorney's fees or costs to a defendant in an action brought   SB1790- 22 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1under this Section, unless the plaintiff was represented by 2counsel in the action and plaintiff's counsel is found by the 3court or the entity enforcing the rules of professional 4conduct of attorney to be in violation of the rules of 5professional conduct.6    (q) An action under this Section may not be brought 7against the federal government, State, or political 8subdivision of the State, or an employee of one of those 9governmental units on the basis of acts or omissions in the 10course of discharge of official duties. 11    Section 20. Offsets to damages and defenses to liability. 12    (a) All of the following are offsets to damages:13        (i) Payments made to a harmed party under a contract 14    of insurance. Insurers have the right to commence a 15    subrogation action against responsible parties for 16    recovery of payments made to harmed parties under a 17    contract of insurance regardless of whether the insured 18    has been made whole.19        (ii) Evidence that a harmed party fully recovered from 20    a public body for alleged injuries.21    (b) All of the following are affirmative defenses to an 22action commenced under this Act:23        (i) Evidence of intentional destruction of property or 24    intentional worsening of damage to reach the amount in 25    controversy threshold.  SB1790- 23 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        (ii) Evidence of gross negligence by the harmed party.2        (iii) The defendant has the burden of proving an 3    affirmative defense under this subsection by a 4    preponderance of the evidence. 5    Section 25. Fee and cost shifting from challenges to 6enforcement. 7    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, including 8an entity, attorney, or law firm, who seeks declaratory or 9injunctive relief to prevent this State, a political 10subdivision, a governmental entity or public official in this 11State, or a person in this State from enforcing any portion of 12this statute, State rules of civil procedure, or any other 13related law that promotes consumer protection and remedies to 14injuries from climate disasters, extreme weather attributable 15to climate change, and harms resulting from long-term changes 16to the climate system, or that represents any litigant seeking 17that relief, is jointly and severally liable to pay the 18attorney's fees and costs of the prevailing party.19    (b) For purposes of this Section, a party is considered a 20prevailing party if a court does either of the following:21        (i) Dismisses any claim or cause of action brought by 22    the party seeking the declaratory or injunctive relief 23    described by this Section, regardless of the reason for 24    the dismissal.25        (ii) Enters judgment in favor of the party opposing   SB1790- 24 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    the declaratory or injunctive relief described by this 2    Section on any claim or cause of action.3    (c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to 4recover attorney's fees or costs in the underlying action, a 5prevailing party under this Section may bring a civil action 6to recover attorney's fees and costs against a person, 7including an entity, attorney, or law firm, that sought 8declaratory or injunctive relief described by this Section no 9later than the third anniversary of the date on which, as 10applicable:11        (i) The dismissal or judgment described by this 12    Section becomes final upon the conclusion of appellate 13    review.14        (ii) The time for seeking appellate review expires.15    (d) None of the following are a defense to an action 16brought under this Section:17        (i) A prevailing party under this Section failed to 18    seek recovery of attorney's fees or costs in the 19    underlying action.20        (ii) The court in the underlying action declined to 21    recognize or enforce the requirements of this Section.22        (iii) The court in the underlying action held that any 23    provision of this Section is invalid, unconstitutional, or 24    preempted by federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of 25    issue or claim preclusion.   SB1790- 25 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    Section 30. Limitations of the Act. This Act may not be 2construed to do any of the following:3        (a) Authorize the commencement of an action under this 4    Act against an entity that is not a responsible party.5        (b) Authorize the commencement of an action under this 6    Act when the amount in controversy requirements are not 7    met.8        (c) Wholly or partly repeal, either expressly or by 9    implication, any other statute that regulates or prohibits 10    any conduct relating to climate disasters, extreme weather 11    attributable to climate change, and harms resulting from 12    long-term changes to the climate system. 13    Section 35. Sovereign, governmental, and official 14immunity. 15    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State has sovereign 16immunity, a political subdivision of the State has 17governmental immunity, and each officer and employee of this 18State or a political subdivision has official immunity in any 19action, claim, or counterclaim or any type of legal or 20equitable action that challenges the validity of any provision 21or application of this Act on constitutional grounds or 22otherwise.23    (b) A provision of State law may not be construed to waive 24or abrogate an immunity described by this Section unless it 25expressly waives immunity under this Section.   SB1790- 26 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1    Section 40. Severability. 2    (a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that every 3provision in this Act and every application of the provisions 4in this Act are severable from each other.5    (b) If any application of any provision in this Act is 6found by a court to be invalid or unconstitutional, the 7remaining applications of that provision to all other persons 8and circumstances shall be severed and shall not be affected. 9All constitutionally valid applications of this Act shall be 10severed from any applications that a court finds to be 11invalid, leaving the valid applications in force, because it 12is the General Assembly's intent that the valid applications 13be allowed to stand alone. Even if a reviewing court finds a 14provision of this Act to impose an unconstitutional burden in 15a large or substantial fraction of relevant cases, the 16applications that do not present an unconstitutional burden 17shall be severed from the remaining applications and shall 18remain in force, and shall be treated as if the General 19Assembly had enacted a statute limited to the persons, group 20of persons, or circumstances for which the statute's 21application does not present an unconstitutional burden.22    (c) If any court declares or finds a provision of this Act 23facially unconstitutional, when discrete applications of that 24provision can be enforced against a person, group of persons, 25or circumstances without violating the United States   SB1790- 27 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1Constitution and the Illinois Constitution, those applications 2shall be severed from all remaining applications of the 3provision, and the provision shall be interpreted as if the 4General Assembly had enacted a provision limited to the 5persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which the 6provision's application will not violate the United States 7Constitution and the Illinois Constitution.8    (d) The General Assembly further declares that it would 9have enacted this Act and each provision regardless of the 10fact that any provision or application of this Act were to be 11declared unconstitutional or to represent an unconstitutional 12burden.13    (e) If any provision of this Act is found by any court to 14be unconstitutionally vague, then the applications of that 15provision that do not present constitutional vagueness 16problems shall be severed and remain in force.17    (f) A court may not decline to enforce the severability 18requirements of this Section on the ground that severance 19would rewrite the statute or involve the court in legislative 20or lawmaking activity. A court that declines to enforce or 21enjoins a State official from enforcing a statutory provision 22of this Act does not rewrite a statute, as the statute 23continues to contain the same words as before the court's 24decision. 25    (g) A statute that provides financial benefits to victims 26or survivors of climate disasters, extreme weather   SB1790- 28 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1attributable to climate change, or harms resulting from 2long-term changes to the climate system or results in the 3collection of damages by the State for damage to consumers and 4State interests, may not be construed to repeal any other 5statute that addresses climate disasters, extreme weather 6attributable to climate change, and harms resulting from 7long-term changes to the climate system, either wholly or 8partly, unless the later-enacted statute explicitly states 9that it is repealing the other statute.10    (h) Every statute that provides financial benefits to 11victims or survivors of climate disasters, extreme weather 12attributable to climate change, and harms resulting from 13long-term changes to the climate system or results in the 14collection of damages by the State for damage to consumers and 15State interests from climate disasters, extreme weather 16attributable to climate change, and harms resulting from 17long-term changes to the climate system, is severable in each 18of its applications to every person and circumstance. If any 19statute that provides financial benefits to victims or 20survivors of climate disasters, extreme weather attributable 21to climate change, and harms resulting from long-term changes 22to the climate system, or results in the collection of damages 23by the State for damage to consumers and State interests from 24climate disasters, extreme weather attributable to climate 25change, and harms resulting from long-term changes to the 26climate system, is found by any court to be unconstitutional,   SB1790- 29 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1either on its face or as applied, then all applications of that 2statute that do not violate the United States Constitution and 3the Illinois Constitution shall be severed from the 4unconstitutional applications and shall remain enforceable, 5notwithstanding any other law, and the statute shall be 6interpreted as if containing language limiting the statute's 7application to the persons, group of persons, or circumstances 8for which the statute's application will not violate the 9United States Constitution and the Illinois Constitution. 10    Section 45. Savings. 11    (a) All existing litigation filed in State courts under 12the statutes of this State may not be expressly or impliedly 13preempted, displaced, mooted, or dismissed upon any other 14prudential consideration arguably arising from this Act.15    (b) To the extent that any aspect of every and all existing 16litigation filed in the courts of this State is reviewed for 17the application of this Act, it is severable in each of its 18applications to every person and circumstance. If any statute 19that provides financial benefits to victims or survivors of 20climate disasters, extreme weather attributable to climate 21change, and harms resulting from long-term changes to the 22climate system, or results in the collection of damages by the 23State for damage to consumers and State interests from climate 24disasters, extreme weather attributable to climate change, and 25harms resulting from long-term changes to the climate system,   SB1790- 30 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1is found by any court to be unconstitutional, either on its 2face or as applied, then all applications of that statute that 3do not violate the United States Constitution and the Illinois 4Constitution shall be severed from the unconstitutional 5applications and shall remain enforceable, notwithstanding any 6other law, and the statute shall be interpreted as if 7containing language limiting the statute's application to the 8persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which the 9statute's application will not violate the United States 10Constitution and the Illinois Constitution.11    (c) The remedies provided in this Act are in addition to 12any other remedy available to a person or the State at common 13law or under statute. This Act may not be interpreted to 14prevent a person or the State from pursuing a civil action or 15any other remedy available at common law or under statute.16    (d) This Act does not do any of the following:17        (i) Relieve the liability of an entity for damages 18    resulting from climate change as provided by law.19        (ii) Preempt, displace, or restrict any rights or 20    remedies of a person, the State, units of local 21    government, or tribal government under law relating to a 22    past, present, or future allegation of any of the 23    following:24            (A) Deception concerning the effects of fossil 25        fuels on climate change.26            (B) Damage or injury resulting from the role of   SB1790- 31 -LRB104 11448 JRC 21536 b1        fossil fuels in contributing to climate change.2            (C) Failure to avoid damage or injury related to 3        climate change, including claims for nuisance, 4        trespass, design defect, negligence, failure to warn, 5        or deceptive or unfair practices and claims for 6        injunctive, declaratory, monetary, or other relief.7    (e) This Act does not preempt, supersede, or displace any 8State law or local ordinance, regulation, policy, or program 9that does any of the following:10        (i) Limit, set, or enforce standards for emissions of 11    greenhouse gases.12        (ii) Monitor, report, or keep records of emissions of 13    greenhouse gases.14        (iii) Collect revenue through fees or levy taxes.15        (iv) Conduct or support investigations. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.